Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-471
Lookalike substance; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) A person shall not offer, display, market, advertise for sale, or sell a lookalike substance. A violation of this section shall be deemed to have occurred if a person knowingly offers, displays, markets, advertises for sale, or sells a lookalike substance and the packaging containing such substance bears a label or marking which:

(a) Is false, misleading, or incomplete;

(b) Does not specifically identify all chemicals or chemical compounds contained on or in the substance or product inside the packaging; or

(c) Does not specifically identify the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor of the product or substance contained inside the packaging.

(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class IV felony. The penalty for a violation of this section shall be in addition to any other applicable criminal offenses or penalties or civil remedies or penalties.

(3) This section shall not apply to lookalike substances intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety of drugs if the drug is plainly labeled for investigational use only and the investigational use is authorized by state or federal law.

Laws 2016, LB1009, § 4.